Alaska statutes. Title 38. Public Land.
Article 8. Mining Rights.
Sec. 38.05.250.
Prospecting permits and leases on tide and submerged land.

The exclusive right to prospect for deposits of minerals subject to AS

38.05.185

—

38.05.275

in or on tide and submerged state land may be granted by a permit issued by the director. A permit shall be granted to the first qualified applicant. A permit may not include an area larger than 2,560 acres, subject to the rule of approximation. Land subject to a prospecting permit shall be as compact in form as possible taking into consideration the area involved. The term of the permit shall be 10 years. Prospecting permits shall be conditioned upon payment of rental against which credit shall be given for useful expenditures on land covered by the permit or group of contiguous permits under common ownership or assignment. Excess expenditures may be applied against rentals due for the following four years. The rental shall be $3 per acre for the first two-year period of the permit, payable on the second anniversary of the permit and $3 per acre for each following year, payable annually on the anniversary date of the permit. Minerals from land under a prospecting permit may not be mined and marketed or used, except for limited amounts necessary for sampling or testing. A person may not take or hold prospecting permits for minerals on state land under this section exceeding in the aggregate 300,000 acres. A person may not take or hold leases for minerals on state land under this section exceeding in the aggregate 100,000 acres.

A noncompetitive lease shall be granted to a holder of a prospecting permit for so much of the land subject to the permit as is shown to the satisfaction of the director to contain workable mineral deposits. Submerged land containing known deposits of minerals subject to AS

38.05.185

—

38.05.275

may, in the discretion of the director, be offered by competitive bid. The land shall be leased to the qualified person offering the highest amount of cash bonus.

Each submerged land mining lease shall be for a period of up to 20 years and for so long as there is production in paying quantities from the leased area. A submerged land mining lease may be renewed for a period of up to 20 years at the discretion of the director if the director determines that the renewal is in the best interests of the state.

The commissioner may, on the request of the lessee, assent to the suspension of operation and production under a lease whenever in the judgment of the commissioner the suspension is necessary to promote development of the lease or the lease cannot be successfully operated under its terms. The payment of acreage rental may be suspended during the period of suspension of operation and production. The suspension of the lease shall extend the term of the lease by adding the period of suspension to the lease. The commissioner may extend the term of a nonproducing lease on an application by the lessee accompanied by a showing that the lessee is reasonably close to attaining production and that, despite diligent good faith efforts by the lessee, the lessee is not able to produce due to force majeure, depressed market conditions, or other situations beyond the reasonable control of the lessee. A suspension or extension granted under this subsection may not exceed two years.

History.

(§ 1 art IX ch 169 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 123 SLA 1961; am § 1 ch 96 SLA 1966; am § 4 ch 87 SLA 1982; am §§ 8 — 12 ch 93 SLA 1984; am § 6 ch 101 SLA 1989; am § 17 ch 27 SLA 2012)

Revisor’s notes. —

Minor word changes related to the recording of documents were made in subsection (c) of this section in 1988 under § 42, ch. 161, SLA 1988.

Administrative Code. —

For offshore permits and leases, see 11 AAC 86, art. 6.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The filing of a prima facie valid application for an offshore prospecting permit under this section acts to segregate the land from the public domain, thereby precluding a later mining claimant from obtaining any right to the minerals in that land, even where the offshore prospecting permit application subsequently is declared void, is withdrawn, or is denied. February 23, 1984, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 38.05.252.
Extralateral rights under shore, tide, and submerged land.

Extralateral rights under shoreland, tideland, and submerged land are confirmed and granted to an owner of a lode mining claim located before January 3, 1959, under the mining laws of the United States.

In this section, “extralateral rights” means rights given to an owner of a mining claim under 30 U.S.C. 26 to follow, and mine, any vein or lode the apex of which lies within the boundaries of the location of the surface of the mining claim, notwithstanding that the course of the vein or lode on its dip or downward direction may so far depart from the perpendicular as to extend beyond the planes which would be formed by the vertical extension downwards of the sidelines of the location.

History.

(§ 1 ch 20 SLA 1985)

Sec. 38.05.255.
Surface use of land or water.

Surface uses of land or water included within a mining property by the owners, lessees, or operators shall be limited to those necessary for the prospecting for, extraction of, or basic processing of minerals and shall be subject to reasonable concurrent uses. Leases for millsites, tailings disposal, and other mine related facilities may be issued by the director. The leases shall be conditioned upon payment of a reasonable annual rent for the lease and restricted to uses approved by the director. Timber from land open to mining without lease, except timberland, may be used by a mining claimant or prospecting site locator for the mining or development of the location or adjacent claims under common ownership. On other land, timber may be acquired as provided in this chapter. Use of water shall be made in accordance with AS 46.15.

A lease issued under this section is exempt from the provisions of AS

38.05.075

—

38.05.080

.

History.

(§ 8 art IX ch 169 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 123 SLA 1961; am § 102 ch 6 SLA 1984; am §§ 14, 15 ch 56 SLA 1997)

Administrative Code. —

For fees for department services, see 11 AAC 5.

For millsites, see 11 AAC 86, art. 7.

Opinions of attorney general. —

State’s removal of gravel from within the claim boundaries of a mining company for use in constructing logging roads in the same area constitutes a “reasonable concurrent use”, but the state should avoid unnecessarily or unreasonably interfering with mining activities. September 7, 1983, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 38.05.260.
Water rights where claim includes both banks of a stream. [Repealed, § 2 ch 50 SLA 1966.
For current law see AS 46.15.]

Sec. 38.05.265.
Abandonment.

Failure to perform the labor or make improvements or make a payment in lieu of labor under AS

38.05.210(a)

, timely record a certificate of location or statement of annual labor, timely pay any required annual rental, or timely pay any required production royalty under AS

38.05.212

constitutes abandonment of all rights acquired under the mining claim, leasehold location, or prospecting site involved, and the claim, leasehold location, or prospecting site is subject to relocation by others, unless the failure constituting the abandonment is cured under (b) of this section. A locator or claimant of an abandoned location or a successor in interest may not relocate the claim, leasehold location, or prospecting site until one year after abandonment. The locator of an abandoned prospecting site may locate a claim or leasehold location on that site at any time. If an annual rental or a royalty payment is deficient but is otherwise timely paid, abandonment does not result if full payment is made within

the period prescribed by a deficiency notice from the department; or

30 days after a final judgment establishing the amount due if the deficiency amount due was contested.

Unless another person has located a mining claim or leasehold location that includes all or part of the mining claim or leasehold location abandoned under (a) of this section or the area is closed to mineral location under AS

38.05.185

—

38.05.275

, a person may cure the failure to record or pay rents or royalties that constituted the abandonment and cure the abandonment by

properly recording a certificate of location or a statement of annual labor, paying any required annual rental, and paying any required production royalty; and

paying a penalty equal to the annual rent for the mining claim or leasehold location that was abandoned under (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 art IX ch 169 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 123 SLA 1961; am § 13 ch 93 SLA 1984; am § 7 ch 101 SLA 1989; am § 16 ch 56 SLA 1997; am § 8 ch 74 SLA 2000; am §§ 1, 2 ch 26 SLA 2004; am § 11 ch 31 SLA 2020)

Revisor’s notes. —

Minor word changes related to the recording of documents were made in this section in 1988 under § 42, ch. 161, SLA 1988.

Administrative Code. —

For staking, recording and maintaining claims and leasehold locations, see 11 AAC 86, art. 2.

For converted MTRSC locations, see 11 AAC 86, art. 3.

For upland mining leases, see 11 AAC 86, art. 4.

For prospecting sites, see 11 AAC 86, art. 5.

For offshore permits and leases, see 11 AAC 86, art. 6.

For mining production royalty, see 11 AAC 86, art. 9.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective April 30, 2020, in (a), substituted “Failure to perform the labor or make improvements or make a payment in lieu of labor under AS

38.05.210

(a), timely record a certificate of location or statement of annual labor, timely pay any required annual rental, or timely pay any required production royalty under AS

38.05.212

” for “Failure to properly record a certificate of location or a statement of annual labor, pay any required annual rental, or pay any required production royalty as required by AS

38.05.185

—

38.05.200

,

38.05.210

—

38.05.245

,

38.05.252

—

38.05.275

, and by regulations adopted under these sections”, deleted the fourth sentence related to a statement of annual labor, and updated internal references, and in (a)(1), substituted “department” for “commissioner”; and in (b), added “rents or royalties” after “pay” near the end of the introductory paragraph.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Requirement under AS

38.05.275

that miners file a copy of the certificate of location if a state-owned riverbed is included in the location is a procedural requirement that should be followed but, if a miner fails to comply with the requirement, he does not forfeit his rights under state law.
June 10, 1982, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 38.05.270.
Transfers.

Evidence of a sale, lease, or other transfer of mining property or interest in mining property shall be recorded.

History.

(§ 10 art IX ch 169 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 123 SLA 1961; am § 12 ch 31 SLA 2020)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective April 30, 2020, rewrote the section.

Sec. 38.05.275.
Recognition of locations.

Mining locations made on state land, including shoreland, tideland, or submerged land, or state selected land, under AS

38.05.185

—

38.05.275

or in the manner described in AS 27.10, acquire for the locator mining rights under AS

38.05.185

—

38.05.275

, subject to existing claims and to any denial of or restriction in the tentative approval of state selection or patent of the land to the state. If shoreland, tideland, or submerged land is included in a mining location or within the projected boundaries of a mining location made in accordance with this section, the locator shall record a certificate of location under AS

38.05.195

. The certificate of location must identify the position of the mining location in the system of rectangular or protracted surveys. If the mining location is made in the manner described in AS 27.10, the commissioner may require that the locator amend the mining location to conform with AS 38.05.185 — 38.05.275 and thereafter to comply with the requirements of AS 38.05.185 — 38.05.275. A mining location on state selected land located within an active unpatented federal mining claim may be located only by or with the written and recorded permission of the holder of the unpatented federal mining claim.

In this section, “state selected land”

means land for which the state has filed a selection application with the United States under Sec. 6 of the Alaska Statehood Act, as amended, regardless of the validity or effect of the application, if the selection described in the application has not been rejected or relinquished;

does not include land described in (1) of this subsection for which a regional corporation organized under 43 U.S.C. 1606(a), as amended, a village corporation organized under 43 U.S.C. 1607(a), as amended, a Native group corporation that qualifies for a land conveyance under 43 U.S.C. 1613(h)(2), as amended, or a Native urban corporation that qualifies for a land conveyance under 43 U.S.C. 1613(h)(3), as amended, has filed a valid selection application with the United States under 43 U.S.C. 1601 — 1641, as amended, if the selection of the corporation or group has not been rejected or relinquished.

Subsection (b) of this section may not be construed to limit the director in the exercise of authority granted by AS

38.05.035(a)(11)

.

History.

(§ 1 art IX ch 169 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 123 SLA 1961; am § 3 ch 96 SLA 1966; am § 14 ch 93 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 47 SLA 1994; am § 9 ch 1 SSSLA 2007; am § 13 ch 31 SLA 2020)

Revisor’s notes. —

Minor word changes related to the recording of documents were made in this section in 1988 under § 42, ch. 161, SLA 1988.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective April 30, 2020, in (a), added the last sentence.

Editor's notes. —

Section 15(b),
ch. 31, SLA 2020, provides that the changes made to (a) of this section apply “to mining locations made on state selected land on or after April 30, 2020.”

Opinions of attorney general. —

This section was intended to provide a solution to the problem presented by miners staking state claims on top of other miners’ federal claims in riverbeds where title to the riverbed as between the state and federal government is unresolved.
June 10, 1982, Op. Att’y Gen.

This section protects valid federal mining claims which include a state-owned riverbed from top-staking under state law. June 10, 1982, Op. Att’y Gen.

Federal locators have rights under state mining law pursuant to this section if they have complied with all federal requirements under AS 27 of the Alaska Statutes.
June 10, 1982, Op. Att’y Gen.

Requirement under this section that miners file a copy of the certificate of location if a state-owned riverbed is included in the location is a procedural requirement that should be followed but, if a miner fails to comply with the requirement, he does not forfeit his rights under state law.
June 10, 1982, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 38.05.280.
[Renumbered as AS 38.05.242.]